Hawaii statutes.
HRS 0657-0001_0005 ANNOTATIONS

Case Notes

Plaintiffs water commission and department of water supply of
county of Hawai`i could not benefit from this section; plaintiffs were
obligated to bring their claims in a timely manner within applicable limitations
period. 930 F. Supp. 1411.

Where plaintiff office of Hawaiian affairs brought suit in
its own corporate name under §10-16, rather than as an agency of the State on
behalf of the people of the State, this section did not exempt plaintiff from
the statute of limitations for bringing a suit under §673-10. 110 H. 338, 133
P.3d 767.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next